District of Columbia statutes.
22-4504.01

Authority to carry firearm in certain places and for certain purposes.

Notwithstanding any other law, a person holding a valid registration for a firearm may carry the firearm:

(1)

Within the registrant’s home;

(2)

While it is being used for lawful recreational purposes;

(3)

While it is kept at the registrant’s place of business; or

(4)

While it is being transported for a lawful purpose as expressly authorized by District or federal statute and in accordance with the requirements of that statute.

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 651, ch. 465, § 4a
as added May 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-388, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1162
Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-388 provided: “Sec. 3. Savings clause. Nothing in section 2 shall affect any action, proceeding, or prosecution commenced before September 16, 2008. Any such action, proceeding, or prosecution shall continue, or may be enforced, in the same manner and to the same extent as if the amendments made by that section had not been made.”